Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Architectural and Engineering Services

45A.800.
Definitions for KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835, 45A.195, 45A.440, and 45A.695.

As used in KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

,

45A.195

,

45A.440

, and

45A.695

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Architect” means an architect licensed under KRS Chapter 323 or a landscape architect licensed under KRS Chapter 323A;

“Engineer” means an engineer licensed under KRS Chapter 322;

“Procuring agency” means either the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the Transportation Cabinet;

“Project” means any undertaking requiring professional architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services, except as provided in KRS

45A.100

;

“User agency” means the state agency or any public supported institution of higher education, when it declines to exercise the authority granted under KRS

164A.590

, that will occupy or otherwise be the primary beneficiary of a completed Finance and Administration Cabinet project;

“User division” means the division of the Transportation Cabinet that requires the procuring of engineering or engineering-related services for a project;

“Engineering-related services” means specialized professional services performed by individuals, consultants, or other organizations of recognized technical competence, education, or experience that are involved in the planning, design, construction, maintenance, or operation of Kentucky’s transportation systems or construction projects in accordance with applicable licensing statutes; and

“Firm” means an individual or other entity that offers professional architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 319, § 3, effective April 3, 1998.

45A.803.
Engineering or related services for federal highway project.

When the Transportation Cabinet provides engineering or related services for a federal highway project pursuant to 23

U.S.C. sec. 112(b)(2)

, the Transportation Cabinet shall follow the process established in KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

as the only alternative to the process established in federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 246, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

45A.805.
Legislative findings of policy.

The General Assembly finds and declares it to be the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to:

Insure the fair and equitable treatment of all firms interested in providing architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services to the Commonwealth;

Announce publicly all requirements for architectural, engineering, and engineering-related services; and

Award a contract for architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services to the best firm, qualified to perform the work on a project, on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification for the type of professional services required and at fair and reasonable prices.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 319, § 8, effective April 3, 1998.

45A.807.
Deadline for promulgation of certain administrative regulations by Finance and Administration Cabinet and Transportation Cabinet.

By January 1, 1995:

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement its procurement of architectural and engineering services pursuant to KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

; and

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement its procurement of engineering services pursuant to KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 95, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.810.
Architectural services selection committees — Engineering or engineering-related services selection committees — Uses — Membership.

One (1) or more architectural services selection committees and one (1) or more engineering or engineering-related services selection committees shall be created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

One (1) or more engineering and engineering-related services selection committees shall be created in the Transportation Cabinet.

Except when an emergency condition exists as defined by KRS 45A.095(1)(a), when architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services are procured under KRS

45A.837

and

45A.838

, or when the project is constructed under KRS 45A.045(11)(a) or (b):

An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet’s procuring architectural services;

An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet’s procuring engineering or engineering-related services; and

An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Transportation Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet’s procuring engineering or engineering-related services.

An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified within each paragraph:

Two (2) architects. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall appoint a pool of at least six (6) architects who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the architects shall be merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select architects from the pool. The first employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;

One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities Management, appointed by the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management, to serve as a nonvoting technical adviser for a given project selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-by-project basis and shall have the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the professional requirements of the project.

Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that agency to serve for the duration of the selection committee’s participation in the project for which they were appointed by the user agency;

An individual. The Kentucky Society of Architects shall nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;

One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1) employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding; and

Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the Department of Facilities Management shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each architectural firm appointed to provide architectural services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified in each paragraph:

Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall appoint a pool of at least six (6) engineers who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the engineers shall be merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool. The first employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;

Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that agency to serve for the duration of the selection committee’s participation in the project for which they were appointed by the user agency;

An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting Engineers Council shall together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;

One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1) employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding;

One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities Management to serve as nonvoting technical adviser for a specific project selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-by-project basis and shall have the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the professional requirements of the project; and

Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the Department of Facilities Management shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or engineering-related services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the Transportation Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified in each paragraph:

Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall appoint a pool of six (6) engineers who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3) of the engineers shall be merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool. The first employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;

Two (2) engineers who are merit employees of the user division appointed by the head of that division to serve for the duration of the selection committee’s participation in the project for which they were appointed by the user agency. However, if two (2) user divisions have approximately equal responsibilities or separate responsibilities for the project, each user division head shall appoint one (1) member to the selection committee;

An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting Engineers Council shall together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or his designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or his designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;

One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1) employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any committee proceeding; and

Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the commissioner of the Department of Highways shall submit a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or engineering-related services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each project shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

All selection committee members shall have experience which qualifies them to serve on the committee.

The same appointment procedures set out in this section apply to any user agency or user division listed in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section that does not operate under a merit system.

Any individual appointed to serve in a pool from which selection committee members are drawn shall serve in the pool for an initial one (1) year term and may be reappointed to succeed himself. He shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a vacancy in the pool, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee. If a selection committee member, drawn from a pool, leaves a selection committee, his replacement shall be drawn from the pool in the same manner as he. The replacement shall have the merit or nonmerit status of his predecessor.

Any individual appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts to serve on selection committees shall serve an initial one (1) year term and may be reappointed to succeed himself. He shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

The selection committee members appointed by the head of a user agency or user division shall serve on a project-by-project basis. These members shall participate only in committee action related to the project for which they were appointed. A replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 319, § 4, effective April 3, 1998; 2017 ch. 175, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

45A.815.
Requirements of procuring agency for selection committee.

Before a person joins a selection committee, he shall receive an orientation from the procuring agency whose secretary appointed members to the committee. The orientation shall include, but not be limited to, an explanation of all statutes and administrative regulations pertaining to the person’s service on the selection committee.

For administrative purposes, a selection committee shall be attached to the procuring agency whose secretary appointed members to the committee.

A procuring agency shall provide a selection committee with:

Suitable quarters in Frankfort, Kentucky, in which to conduct its business;

An executive secretary and any other staff support necessary for the expeditious conduct of a selection committee’s duties and responsibilities; and

Office supplies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.820.
Compensation and expense reimbursement of selection committee members.

Selection committee members who are not employees of state agencies or state universities shall receive a salary of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for those days authorized by the selection committee for selection committee activities.

Selection committee members who are employees of state agencies or state universities shall not receive a salary for their time spent on selection committee activities, and the state government salaries of these committee members shall not be reduced due to time spent away from other state government activities.

All selection committee members shall be reimbursed for costs necessarily incurred in carrying out their duties. All reimbursements shall be authorized by the selection committee.

The procuring agency shall pay all costs generated under this section by a selection committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 319, § 6, effective April 3, 1998.

45A.825.
Prequalification of interested firms — Request for proposals — Responses — Procedures for evaluating proposals and negotiating contract — Exception.

A firm shall not be considered for providing architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services to the Finance and Administration Cabinet or engineering or engineering-related services to the Transportation Cabinet unless the relevant procuring agency has prequalified the firm prior to notice of a request for proposals to which that firm intends to respond.

A firm’s prequalification shall remain in effect for twelve (12) months from the date of prequalification.

The procuring agency shall consult with the user agency or user division before arriving at a request for proposals.

The request for proposals:

Shall include as an evaluation factor whether the work tasks are to be performed in Kentucky or outside Kentucky;

Shall indicate the relative weight of evaluation factors, including the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

; and

Shall establish a timetable for:

The selection committee’s first meeting held pursuant to subsection (6) of this section; and

The selection committee’s activities conducted pursuant to subsection (7)(b) of this section or subsection (8)(b), (d), and (e) of this section, as appropriate.

The procuring agency shall provide adequate public notice of a request for proposals and notice of the materials that the procuring agency will provide to a firm to assist that firm in responding to a request for proposals. Those materials shall include, but not be limited to, the request for proposals and the project evaluation sheet to be used by the relevant selection committee. The notice shall also set a deadline for filing responses to a request for proposals with the procuring agency. It shall be the intent of this subsection that firms in all regions of the Commonwealth are given an equal opportunity to be selected.

A firm shall respond to a request for proposals by submitting before the deadline, a completed form, devised by the procuring agency, which states the firm’s experience and its qualifications for the project as described in the request for proposals. A firm which fails to meet the deadline shall be barred from the procurement process.

The employees of a procuring agency and the members of the selection committee shall keep all responses to a request for proposals confidential until the procuring agency has awarded a contract.

The secretary of the procuring agency shall designate a procuring agency employee to determine which firms have prequalified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and have filed, in a timely fashion, responses to a request for proposals. He shall create a list of the firms which have done so and certify the list.

The procuring agency shall organize the selection committee’s first meeting. At that meeting, each selection committee member shall sign a statement of confidentiality. Also, at that meeting, the selection committee shall:

Elect from among the voting members of the committee a chairman and a vice chairman who shall hold their positions for the duration of the selection committee’s participation in the project;

Be provided with:

The certified list created pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;

The firms’ responses to the request for proposals;

The request for proposals;

The notice of request for proposals; and

The project evaluation sheets; and

Discuss the future conduct of its affairs.

When the Transportation Cabinet procures any engineering or engineering-related services, or when the Finance and Administration Cabinet procures architectural services for an estimated fee of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or engineering or engineering-related services for an estimated fee of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), this subsection and subsection (9) of this section shall govern the procurement process.

The selection committee shall meet in executive session to:

Evaluate the materials with which it has been provided;

Select the three (3) most qualified firms and rank them in order of preference, based upon the weighted evaluation factors established in the request for proposals; and

Notify the procuring agency of the ranking.

The procuring agency shall notify each firm which responded to the request for proposals, informing the firm of:

The three (3) finalists;

Their ranking; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the contract.

The procuring agency shall then begin negotiations with the top-ranked firm pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.

When the Finance and Administration Cabinet is procuring architectural services for an estimated fee of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more or engineering or engineering-related services for an estimated fee of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, this subsection and subsection (9) of this section shall govern the procurement process.

The selection committee shall meet in executive session to:

Evaluate the materials with which it has been provided;

Select, but not rank, the three (3) most qualified firms, based upon the weighted evaluation factors established in the request for proposals; and

Notify the procuring agency of the three (3) finalists.

The procuring agency shall notify each firm which responded to the request for proposals, informing the firm of:

The three (3) finalists; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the contract.

The selection committee shall interview the three (3) finalists, preferably on the same day. The finalists shall be interviewed one (1) at a time, and each interview shall be attended only by representatives of the finalist and members of the selection committee. Members of the selection committee shall keep confidential the substance of an interview until the procuring agency has awarded a contract.

The selection committee shall meet in executive session to:

Rank the three (3) finalists based upon the weighted evaluation factors established in the request for proposals; and

Forward the ranking to the procuring agency.

The procuring agency shall notify each finalist, informing the finalist of:

His ranking; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the contract.

The procuring agency shall then begin negotiations with the top-ranked firm pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.

The secretary of the procuring agency shall designate a procuring agency employee as the procuring officer in charge of negotiating a contract with the top-ranked firm, as determined by the selection committee, at compensation which the procuring officer determines in writing to be fair and reasonable to the Commonwealth. In making this decision, the employee shall take into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered, and the scope, complexity, and professional nature thereof. Should the procuring officer be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the top-ranked firm, at a price that he considers fair and reasonable to the Commonwealth, he shall formally terminate negotiations with the firm. The procuring officer shall then undertake negotiations with the second-ranked firm. Failing accord with the second-ranked firm, the purchasing officer shall formally terminate negotiations. The purchasing officer shall then undertake negotiations with the third-ranked firm. Should the purchasing officer be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with any of the selected firms, he shall formally terminate negotiations, and the procurement procedure shall start again from the beginning pursuant to KRS

45A.810

.

Once a procuring officer has negotiated a contract, the procuring agency shall notify the other finalists, informing them of:

Which firm has successfully negotiated a contract; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the contract.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

45A.045

, when the Transportation Cabinet is the procuring agency, the negotiated contract shall take effect without the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the procurement of architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services under KRS

45A.837

and

45A.838

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 95, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 246, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 120, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 319, § 5, effective April 3, 1998; 2010, ch. 162, § 17, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.827.
Criterion to break tie vote of selection committee.

If a selection committee vote results in a tie between two (2) firms, one (1) of which will perform more of the work tasks in Kentucky than the other, then the former firm shall be ranked one (1) place ahead of the latter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 95, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.830.
Copies of proposed contracts to be made available to selection committee — Certifications to be made upon negotiation of contract — Filing with Government Contract Review Committee.

For architectural, engineering, and engineering-related construction services procured under KRS

45A.180

and

45A.825

, the procuring officer shall make available a copy of the proposed contract to each member of the selection committee involved in the procurement process for that contract after the procuring officer has negotiated an architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services contract for the Finance and Administration Cabinet or an engineering or engineering-related services contract for the Transportation Cabinet, but before the contract is submitted to the Government Contract Review Committee.

For architectural, engineering, and engineering-related construction services procured under KRS

45A.180

and

45A.825

, the secretary of the procuring agency, the procuring officer, and each voting member of the selection committee shall sign separate certificates, devised by the procuring agency, that shall provide the signatory with the option of certifying that, to the best of his knowledge, he is either aware or unaware of circumstances that may constitute a violation of this chapter occurring in the procurement process. Any employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts, who served as a nonvoting member of the selection committee and who attended any committee proceeding, may participate in the preparation of a report for filing with the Government Contract Review Committee certifying that the applicable procedural provisions of subsections (4), (6), (7), and (8) of KRS

45A.825

were or were not met. Before filing the report, the employee or employees who participated in its preparation shall sign it.

For architectural, engineering, and engineering-related construction services procured under KRS

45A.180

and

45A.825

, the procuring agency shall maintain the following information, readily available to the Government Contract Review Committee upon request:

The certificates;

The selection committee’s ranking of firms; and

A statement affirming that responding firms in all regions of the Commonwealth were given equal consideration for selection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 95, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 246, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 120, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 319, § 7, effective April 3, 1998; 1998, ch. 486, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 98, § 13, effective June 24, 2003.

45A.835.
Persons who are prohibited from serving in pool or on selection committee.

A person shall not serve in a pool from which selection committee members are drawn or on a selection committee if that person, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings, or any of his children is employed by a firm which has been prequalified by the procuring agency relevant to the selection committee pursuant to KRS 45A.825(1) or owns one percent (1%) or more of a firm which has been prequalified by the procuring agency relevant to the selection committee pursuant to KRS 45A.825(1).

If, in the course of an individual’s service, he, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings, or any of his children becomes employed by a firm which has been prequalified by the procuring agency relevant to the selection committee pursuant to KRS 45A.825(1) or owns one percent (1%) or more of a firm which has been prequalified by the procuring agency relevant to the selection committee pursuant to KRS 45A.825(1), then his service shall end.

For a period of one (1) year after a person ends his service on a selection committee, the Commonwealth shall not consider a firm for an architectural, engineering, or engineering related services contract if that person, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings or any of his children is employed by a firm which was awarded a contract by a selection committee on which he served or owns one percent (1%) or more of a firm which was awarded a contract by a selection committee on which he served.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 55, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 95, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.836.
Eligibility of entities selected under KRS 45A.810 to act as offerors in certain circumstances.

The entity selected under KRS

45A.810

to draft the preliminary project design or specifications that forms the basis of a request for proposal for a project utilizing the design-build project delivery method shall not be eligible to act as an offeror to the request for proposal for procuring a design-build team for that project.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 98, § 9, effective June 24, 2003.

45A.837.
Price contracts for architectural, engineering, and engineering-related services — Review procedure required.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

, the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Transportation Cabinet may enter into price contracts for architectural, engineering, and engineering-related services. If the agencies choose to enter into a price contract, subsection (2) of this section shall apply.

Price contracts shall be awarded to firms qualified by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Facilities Management or by the Transportation Cabinet, Department of Highways. The Finance and Administration Cabinet selection committee established by KRS

45A.810

shall meet at least quarterly during each fiscal year to review and make recommendations to the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management for qualification of interested firms. The Transportation Cabinet selection committee established by KRS

45A.810

shall meet at least quarterly during each fiscal year to review and make recommendations to the commissioner of the Department of Highways for qualification of interested firms.

The respective committees shall evaluate those firms submitting statements of interest in obtaining a price contract. The submitting firms shall be reviewed according to the following criteria:

Qualifications;

Ability of professional personnel; and

Past record and experience.

Firms qualified by the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management or by the commissioner of the Department of Highways shall be awarded price contracts by the respective departments for the type of work for which they have been qualified.

The commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management or the commissioner of the Department of Highways may select firms to perform work under price contract for small projects for which the architectural, engineering, or engineering-related fees do not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). However, no firm that has received more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in price contract fees in any one (1) fiscal year in the contract discipline being awarded shall be selected to work under a price contract unless the secretary of finance and administration or the secretary of transportation makes a written determination that the selection is in the best interest of the Commonwealth and the determination is confirmed by the appropriate cabinet’s selection committee established by KRS 45A.810.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, no price contract shall be awarded under the provisions of this section before completion of the review procedure provided for in KRS

45A.695

and

45A.705

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 319, § 1, effective April 3, 1998; 2015 ch. 105, § 12, effective June 24, 2015.

45A.838.
Establishment and operation of pool of firms to provide professional contract services — Administrative regulations to be promulgated by Transportation Cabinet.

If choosing to operate under this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall, by administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, designate each type of project for which a pool of firms is to be established and from which the firm to provide the needed architectural, engineering, or engineering-related contract services is to be selected. The project types designated by these administrative regulations shall be limited to those projects for which the professional services to be rendered for each individual contract are substantially similar and to those project types for which architectural, engineering, or engineering-related fees are expected to be at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

The Transportation Cabinet selection committee established under KRS

45A.810

shall annually select the engineering or engineering-related services firms for each pool in accordance with the standards for application and selection established by administrative regulation under subsection (4) of this section.

Once selected for a particular pool, a firm providing architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services shall remain in the pool for two (2) years unless disqualified under subsection (6) of this section. Upon the expiration of the two (2) year period, a firm may reapply for selection.

The procedures and criteria for qualifying and selecting the firms to be placed in each annual pool shall be set forth in administrative regulations promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet. The administrative regulations shall provide for adequate notice to firms of the establishment of the individual pools, an application procedure for a firm interested in the pool for a particular type of project, the deadline for submission of the application, and the criteria to be used for the establishment of each pool.

The procedures for determining which firm is to be selected from the pool to provide services for a particular project shall be set forth in administrative regulations promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet.

The secretary of transportation may remove a firm from a pool for good cause. Any firm that has been removed from a pool may, within thirty (30) days after the removal, petition the secretary for reinstatement. Within sixty (60) days following the secretary’s receipt of a petition, the selection committee shall meet to consider the request for reinstatement. If the selection committee recommends that the firm be reinstated to the pool and the secretary accepts the recommendation, the affected firm shall be reinstated.

After one (1) year of disqualification, a firm that has been removed from a pool under subsection (6) of this section may reapply to be qualified.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require use of any pool for a particular project if the responsible cabinet has determined that the project does not meet the criteria established for pool projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 319, § 2, effective April 3, 1998.